Rhode Island statutes. Title 32 Parks and Recreational Areas
Chapter 2 Metropolitan Park District

32-2-1.
Area included in district.

The jurisdiction and powers of the director of environmental management, insofar as the jurisdiction and powers relate to metropolitan parks, shall extend to, and may be exercised in, the cities of Providence, Pawtucket, Cranston, Warwick, and Central Falls; the towns of East Providence, Johnston, North Providence, Lincoln, and Barrington; and the voting districts numbers three (3), four (4), and five (5) in the town of Cumberland. Those cities, towns, and voting districts shall constitute the metropolitan park district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1909, ch. 410, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-1

.

32-2-2.
Acquisition of land for parks.

The department of environmental management shall have the power to acquire, maintain, and make available to the inhabitants of the metropolitan park district, and to the public generally, open spaces for exercise and recreation, and for intercommunication between them and adjacent streets and highways; and to this end, and acting as far as may be in consultation with the respective city and town councils and park commissioners of the cities and towns listed in §

32-2-1

, the director of environmental management is hereby authorized to take in fee simple or otherwise, in the name and for the benefit of the state, by purchase, gift, or devise, or by eminent domain in such a manner as may now or hereafter be provided by the general assembly, lands and interests, estates, and rights therein, for the public use within the metropolitan park district, and to enter into written contracts for the conveyance thereof to the department, for those purposes and uses, and further, to improve, preserve, care for, and administer those public reservations, and also, in the discretion of the director, and upon such terms and conditions as he or she may approve, such other lands and interests, estates, and rights therein, or funds in trust, as may be entrusted, given, conveyed, or devised to the department or to the state by the United States or by cities, towns, corporations, or individuals for the general purposes of this chapter, or for any one or more of those purposes, as the grantor, donor, or devisor may designate; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the existing rights of any city or town in relation to water supply purposes, or in any way obstruct or destroy the privilege of any such city or town to take advantage of those rights.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-2

.

32-2-3.
Purchase of land by agreement.

If any person shall agree in writing with the director for the price of his or her land or for his or her interest, right, or estate therein, so taken, the amount thus agreed upon shall be paid to him or her forthwith upon the delivery by him or her of a good and sufficient warranty or other deed satisfactory to the director in fee simple.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-3

.

32-2-4.
Rules and regulations — Enforcement — Powers of director.

The director of the department of environmental management may make rules and regulations for the control, government, and use of all the public properties and highways under his or her care. A person violating the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a civil violation and be subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. Jurisdiction over violations of this section shall be with the traffic tribunal. In accordance with chapter 17.10 of title 42, any person charged with violating the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this section may elect to dispose of the charge without personally appearing before the traffic tribunal by mailing or delivering the form and summons to the traffic tribunal with a check or money order in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100). In general, the director may do all acts needful for the proper execution of the powers and duties granted to, and imposed upon, the director by the terms of this chapter. The director shall also have power to expend such funds as may be given in trust, and the income thereof, in accordance with the terms of the trusts, as provided for in §

32-2-6

.

Those persons duly authorized by the director of the department of environmental management to exercise the powers specified in §§

2-10-13

,

2-12-8

,

2-12-19

,

37-15-2

, and/or

46-22-17

, may also be commissioned by the director of the department to enforce any rules or regulations promulgated by the director of the department as applicable to public properties under his or her care.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-4

; P.L. 1972, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 253, § 7; P.L. 2007, ch. 294, § 7.

32-2-5.
Disbursement of funds held in treasury.

To meet the expenses incurred under the foregoing provisions of this chapter, the state controller is hereby authorized and directed, upon receipt of vouchers properly authenticated by the director of environmental management, to draw his or her orders on the general treasurer for the payment of the vouchers, from the amounts hitherto appropriated by, and from any other moneys held in the general treasury under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-5

.

32-2-6.
Acceptance of gifts — Metropolitan park trust fund.

The general treasurer is hereby directed, authorized, and empowered, with the approval of the governor, to receive, take title to, and hold in trust for the state, exempt from taxation, any gift, grant, or devise, of lands or interests, estates or rights therein, and any gift or bequest of money or other personal property, made for the purposes of this chapter, subject to the approval of the director of environmental management; and unless otherwise provided by the terms of any gift or bequest of money or other personal property, the general treasurer shall preserve and invest that money or the proceeds of that other personal property in notes and bonds secured by good and sufficient mortgage security, or in such securities as by law the sinking fund commission is authorized to invest. The trust property and real estate shall be known as the metropolitan park trust fund and shall be used under the direction of the department of environmental management, subject to the orders of the director of the department, under the terms of such trusts as may be provided by the donors thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 200; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-6

.

32-2-7.
Agreements with cities and towns — Transfer of control of parks.

Any city or town within the metropolitan park district is hereby authorized and empowered to transfer the care and control of any open space owned or controlled by it to the department of environmental management, upon such terms and conditions and for such period as may be mutually agreed upon; or to enter into an agreement in writing with the department for the joint care, control, or preservation of open spaces within or adjacent to the city or town; and the department of environmental management may in like manner transfer the care, control, and preservation of any open space controlled by it to any city or town within the metropolitan park district, with the consent of that city or town and upon such terms and for such period as may be mutually agreed upon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-7

.

32-2-8.
Commissioners — Apportionment of expenses.

The superior court shall, on the application of the director of environmental management, and after notice to each of the cities and towns hereinbefore designated, appoint three (3) commissioners who shall not be residents of those cities and towns, who shall, after the notice and hearing, and in such manner as they shall deem just and equitable, determine the proportion in which each of those cities and towns shall annually pay money into the treasury of the state for the term of five (5) years next following the year of the first issue of the scrip or certificates of indebtedness, to meet the interest and sinking fund requirements for each of those years as estimated by the general treasurer of the state, and to meet the expenses of preservation and necessary care of the public reservations as estimated by the director of environmental management and certified by them to the general treasurer, and any deficiency in the amount previously paid in as found by the treasurer, and shall return their award into the court; and when the award shall have been accepted by the court, it shall be final and conclusive adjudication of all matters herein referred to the commissioners and shall be binding on all parties. Before the expiration of that term of five (5) years, and every five (5) years thereafter, three (3) commissioners who shall not be residents of any of the cities or towns constituting the metropolitan park district shall again be appointed, with the same powers and duties for the next succeeding term of five (5) years; provided, that if the commissioners appointed during the first term of five (5) years, shall before the expiration of the term decide that the work of acquiring and improving land for metropolitan park purposes is not sufficiently advanced or that the improvements contemplated by this chapter are not so distributed over the various portions of the metropolitan park district as to permit of a reasonable estimation of the relative benefits to be derived by the several cities and towns, or if the works under way or in immediate contemplation are of such character that the benefits to be derived therefrom would speedily and materially alter the equity of an award made within that term, they may, with the consent of the superior court, postpone the return of their award to the court for such further period not to exceed three (3) years, as they may deem necessary in order to arrive at a more uniform and satisfactory basis of assessment; and further provided, that no assessment shall be levied for the purposes of this chapter in any one year upon any city or town in excess of a sum equal to one-half (1/2) mill on the dollar of the valuation thereof.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction in equity to enforce the provisions of this chapter and shall fix and determine the compensation of all commissioners appointed by the court under the provisions hereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 7; P.L. 1913, ch. 963, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-8

.

32-2-9.
Payment of assessments by cities and towns.

The amount of money required each year from each city and town of the metropolitan park district to meet the interest, sinking fund requirements, and expenses for each year, and the deficiency, if any, shall be estimated by the general treasurer in accordance with the proportion as determined in §

32-2-8

, and shall be included in, and made a part of, the sum charged in the city or town and shall be annually assessed upon it. The general treasurer shall in each year give notice to each city and town of the amount of the assessment, and each of the cities and towns shall pay its respective assessments, into the state treasury, one-half (1/2) thereof to be paid on or before April 15 and one-half (1/2) thereof to be paid on or before October 15, in each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-9

.

32-2-10.
Appointment of park police.

The director of the department of environmental management may, from time to time, appoint one or more persons who may act at the expense of the funds to the credit of the director of environmental management, in the hands of the general treasurer, as police officers upon the premises, subject to the control of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1077, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-10

; P.L. 1972, ch. 83, § 1.

32-2-11.
Powers of park police.

All full-time park policemen assigned to the division of enforcement within the department of environmental management, including the chief of the division and the chief of the metropolitan park police, shall have and may exercise, on any property under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental management, with regard to the enforcement of the criminal laws and all rules and regulations of the department of environmental management, all the powers of deputy sheriffs, town police officers, and constables, provided, however, that when any person is suspected of having committed a felony, the superintendent of state police, as he or she shall so require, shall be notified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1077, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-11

; P.L. 1972, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 61.

32-2-12.
Park police auxiliary force.

The director of the department of environmental management is authorized to recruit, train, and organize a park police auxiliary force to serve on a seasonal or part-time basis and possessing such qualifications as he or she shall determine. The park police auxiliary force shall at all times be under the direction of the chief of the division of enforcement in the department of environmental management. Members of the park police auxiliary force shall carry out such duties and functions as may be assigned to them from time to time by the chief of the division of enforcement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1077, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-12

; P. L. 1972, ch. 83, § 1.

32-2-13.
Duties of auxiliary force — Limitations.

Members of the park police auxiliary force shall be equipped with uniforms prescribed by the chief of the division of enforcement and delegated specific police powers and specific police duties. They may bear and use firearms only when specifically authorized by the chief and only when in uniform and while assigned to active duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1077, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-13

; P.L. 1972, ch. 83, § 1.

32-2-14.
Use of state owned golf courses.

No fee shall be charged to any person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older and who is eligible to participate in the Rhode Island pharmaceutical assistance to the elderly program and an entrance fee not exceeding one half (1/2) of the established and posted rates shall be charged any other person sixty-five (65) years of age and older for the playing of golf on any golf course owned and operated by the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-2-14

; P.L. 1959, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 14, § 2.

32-2-15.
Local police authority.

All members of local city and town police departments shall have, and may exercise, all powers and authority of police officers on any property under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental management and within the territory of the respective city or town with regard to the enforcement of the criminal laws and all rules and regulations of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 190, § 1.